Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-114
Cedar.

The county of Cedar is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point in the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River, at which the line dividing ranges one and two, west, crosses said river; thence south to the southwest corner of township twenty-nine, north, of range one, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-nine, north, of range one, west; thence south to the southeast corner of township twenty-eight, north, of range one, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-eight, north, of range three, east; thence north to the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River; thence up said channel to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 9, p. 214;

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 73;

R.S.1913, § 827;

C.S.1922, § 729;

C.S.1929, § 25-116;

R.S.1943, § 22-114.